Montana, session 2025, HB108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 15-8-111, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-8-111. Appraisal -- market value standard -- exceptions. (1) All taxable property must be
appraised at 100% of its market value except as otherwise provided.
(2) (a) Market value is the value at which property would change hands between a willing buyer
and a willing seller, neither being under any compulsion to buy or to sell and both having reasonable knowledge
of relevant facts.
(b) If the department uses the cost approach as one approximation of market value, the
department shall fully consider reduction in value caused by depreciation, whether through physical
depreciation, functional obsolescence, or economic obsolescence.
(c) If the department uses the income approach as one approximation of market value and
sufficient, relevant information on comparable sales and construction cost exists, the department shall rely upon
the two methods that provide a similar market value as the better indicators of market value.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (4), the market value of special mobile equipment and
agricultural tools, implements, and machinery is the average wholesale value shown in national appraisal
guides and manuals or the value before reconditioning and profit margin. The department shall prepare
valuation schedules showing the average wholesale value when a national appraisal guide does not exist.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 108
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 108
(3) (a) In valuing class four residential and commercial property described in 15-6-134, the
department shall conduct the appraisal following the appropriate uniform standards of professional appraisal
practice for mass appraisal promulgated by the appraisal standards board of the appraisal foundation. In
valuing the property, the department shall use information available from any source considered reliable.
Comparable properties used for valuation must represent similar properties within an acceptable proximity of
the property being valued. The department shall use the same valuation method to value residential properties
in the same neighborhood or subdivision unless there is a compelling reason to use a different approach.
(b) When valuing residential property under the cost approach, the department shall document
why the comparable sales model does not support usage of the comparable sales approach, including an
analysis of whether the cost approach is used for other class four residential property in the market area.
(4) The department may not adopt a lower or different standard of value from market value in
making the official assessment and appraisal of the value of property, except:
(a) the market value for agricultural implements and machinery is the average wholesale value
category as provided in published national agricultural and implement valuation guides. The valuation guide
must provide average wholesale values specific to the state of Montana or a region that includes the state of
Montana. The department shall adopt by rule the valuation guides used as provided in this subsection (4)(a). If
the average wholesale value category is unavailable, the department shall use a comparable wholesale value
category.
(b) for agricultural implements and machinery not listed in an official guide, the department shall
prepare a supplemental manual in which the values reflect the same depreciation as those found in the official
guide;
(c)(b) (i) for condominium property, the department shall establish the value as provided in
subsection (5); and
(ii) for a townhome or townhouse, as defined in 70-23-102, the department shall determine the
value in a manner established by the department by rule; and
(d)(c) as otherwise authorized in Titles 15 and 61.
(5) (a) Subject to subsection (5)(c), if sufficient, relevant information on comparable sales is
available, the department shall use the sales comparison approach to appraise residential condominium units.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 108
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 108
Because the undivided interest in common elements is included in the sales price of the condominium units, the
department is not required to separately allocate the value of the common elements to the individual units being
valued.
(b) Subject to subsection (5)(c), if sufficient, relevant information on income is made available to
the department, the department shall use the income approach to appraise commercial condominium units.
Because the undivided interest in common elements contributes directly to the income-producing capability of
the individual units, the department is not required to separately allocate the value of the common elements to
the individual units being valued.
(c) If sufficient, relevant information on comparable sales is not available for residential
condominium units or if sufficient, relevant information on income is not made available for commercial
condominium units, the department shall value condominiums using the cost approach. When using the cost
approach, the department shall value the units individually and allocate only the common area elements to the
units based on the percentage of undivided interest in the condominium declaration.
(6) For purposes of taxation, assessed value is the same as appraised value.
(7) The taxable value for all property is the market value multiplied by the tax rate for each class of
property.
(8) The market value of properties in 15-6-131 through 15-6-134, 15-6-143, and 15-6-145 is as
follows:
(a) Properties in 15-6-131, under class one, are assessed at 100% of the annual net proceeds
after deducting the expenses specified and allowed by 15-23-503 or, if applicable, as provided in 15-23-515,
15-23-516, 15-23-517, or 15-23-518.
(b) Properties in 15-6-132, under class two, are assessed at 100% of the annual gross proceeds.
(c) Properties in 15-6-133, under class three, are assessed at 100% of the productive capacity of
the lands when valued for agricultural purposes. All lands that meet the qualifications of 15-7-202 are valued as
agricultural lands for tax purposes.
(d) Properties in 15-6-134, under class four, are assessed at 100% of market value.
(e) Properties in 15-6-143, under class ten, are assessed at 100% of the forest productivity value
of the land when valued as forest land.
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 108
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 108
(f) Railroad transportation properties in 15-6-145 are assessed based on the valuation formula
described in 15-23-205.
(9) Land and the improvements on the land are separately assessed when any of the following
conditions occur:
(a) ownership of the improvements is different from ownership of the land;
(b) the taxpayer makes a written request; or
(c) the land is outside an incorporated city or town.
(10) For the purpose of this section, the term "compelling reason" includes but is not limited to the
following:
(a) there are no comparable sales in the neighborhood or subdivision;
(b) the comparable sales model prepared by the department shows that the subject property
cannot be valued using the market sales approach; or
(c) other residential properties in the same neighborhood or subdivision are also valued using the
cost approach and not the market sales approach."
Section 2. Applicability. [This act] applies to tax years beginning after December 31, 2025.
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 108
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 108, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 108
INTRODUCED BY E. TILLEMAN
BY REQUEST OF THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
AN ACT REVISING PROPERTY TAX VALUATION REQUIREMENTS FOR CERTAIN AGRICULTURAL
IMPLEMENTS AND MACHINERY; ELIMINATING THE REQUIREMENT THAT THE DEPARTMENT OF
REVENUE PREPARE A SUPPLEMENTAL VALUATION MANUAL WHEN AGRICULTURAL IMPLEMENTS AND
MACHINERY IS NOT LISTED IN AN OFFICIAL GUIDE; AMENDING SECTION 15-8-111, MCA; AND
PROVIDING AN APPLICABILITY DATE.”